Illinois, session 104th, SB2051.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Biometric Information Privacy Act is 5amended by changing Sections 10 and 25 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 14/10)7    Sec. 10. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Biometric identifier" means a retina or iris scan, 9fingerprint, voiceprint, or scan of hand or face geometry. 10Biometric identifiers do not include writing samples, written 11signatures, photographs, human biological samples used for 12valid scientific testing or screening, demographic data, 13tattoo descriptions, or physical descriptions such as height, 14weight, hair color, or eye color. Biometric identifiers do not 15include donated organs, tissues, or parts as defined in the 16Illinois Anatomical Gift Act or blood or serum stored on 17behalf of recipients or potential recipients of living or 18cadaveric transplants and obtained or stored by a federally 19designated organ procurement agency. Biometric identifiers do 20not include biological materials regulated under the Genetic 21Information Privacy Act. Biometric identifiers do not include 22information captured from a patient in a health care setting 23or information collected, used, or stored for health care   SB2051- 2 -LRB104 10585 JRC 20661 b1treatment, payment, or operations under the federal Health 2Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996. 3Biometric identifiers do not include an X-ray, roentgen 4process, computed tomography, MRI, PET scan, mammography, or 5other image or film of the human anatomy used to diagnose, 6prognose, or treat an illness or other medical condition or to 7further validate scientific testing or screening.8    "Biometric information" means any information, regardless 9of how it is captured, converted, stored, or shared, based on 10an individual's biometric identifier used to identify an 11individual. Biometric information does not include information 12derived from items or procedures excluded under the definition 13of biometric identifiers.14    "Confidential and sensitive information" means personal 15information that can be used to uniquely identify an 16individual or an individual's account or property. Examples of 17confidential and sensitive information include, but are not 18limited to, a genetic marker, genetic testing information, a 19unique identifier number to locate an account or property, an 20account number, a PIN number, a pass code, a driver's license 21number, or a social security number.22    "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, 23or process attached to or logically associated with a record 24and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the 25record.26    "Private entity" means any individual, partnership,   SB2051- 3 -LRB104 10585 JRC 20661 b1corporation, limited liability company, association, or other 2group, however organized. A private entity does not include a 3State or local government agency. A private entity does not 4include any court of Illinois, a clerk of the court, or a judge 5or justice thereof.6    "Vehicle safety purpose" means the purpose of promoting 7driver, occupant, and roadway safety, including providing 8warnings or alerts to drivers regarding distraction, fatigue, 9or other safety-related events, including, but not limited to, 10wearing a seatbelt, detecting pedestrians, and vehicle 11occupants. 12    "Vehicle safety technology" means a system used for a 13vehicle safety purpose in which the input is images of the 14inside or outside of a vehicle and the output is a prediction 15of a safety-related event, and the system may temporarily 16collect, use or process biometric identifiers to make 17predictions, as long as any such biometric identifier is not 18retained longer than reasonably necessary to satisfy a vehicle 19safety purpose or used to identity an individual.20    "Written release" means informed written consent, 21electronic signature, or, in the context of employment, a 22release executed by an employee as a condition of employment.23(Source: P.A. 103-769, eff. 8-2-24.) 24    (740 ILCS 14/25)25    Sec. 25. Construction.   SB2051- 4 -LRB104 10585 JRC 20661 b1    (a) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to impact the 2admission or discovery of biometric identifiers and biometric 3information in any action of any kind in any court, or before 4any tribunal, board, agency, or person.5    (b) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to conflict 6with the X-Ray Retention Act, the federal Health Insurance 7Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and the rules 8promulgated under either Act.9    (c) Nothing in this Act shall be deemed to apply in any 10manner to a financial institution or an affiliate of a 11financial institution that is subject to Title V of the 12federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999 and the rules 13promulgated thereunder.14    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to conflict 15with the Private Detective, Private Alarm, Private Security, 16Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004 and the rules 17promulgated thereunder.18    (e) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to apply to a 19contractor, subcontractor, or agent of a State agency or local 20unit of government when working for that State agency or local 21unit of government.22    (f) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to apply to an 23entity using vehicle safety technology for a vehicle safety 24purpose, as long as any biometric identifier is not retained 25longer than is reasonably necessary to satisfy a vehicle 26safety purpose and is not used to identify any individual.   SB2051- 5 -LRB104 10585 JRC 20661 b1(Source: P.A. 95-994, eff. 10-3-08.)